Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-109 Exemption from examination.
(a) Subject to section 431:9A-116, an individual who applies for an insurance
producer license in this State who was previously licensed for the same lines
of authority in another state shall not be required to complete any
prelicensing education or examination. This exemption is only available if the
person is currently licensed in that state or if the application is received
within ninety days of the cancellation of the applicant's previous license and
if the prior state issues a certification that, at the time of cancellation,
the applicant was licensed in good standing in that state, or the state's
producer database records, maintained by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, its affiliates, or its subsidiaries, indicate that the producer
is or was licensed in good standing for the line of authority requested.

(b) A person licensed as an insurance producer
in another state who moves to this State shall make application within ninety
days of establishing legal residence to become a resident licensee pursuant to
section 431:9A-106. No prelicensing educational component or examination shall
be required of that person to obtain any line of authority previously held in
the prior state except where the commissioner determines otherwise by rule. [L
2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §63]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next